Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1407
Casket, defined.

Casket means a receptacle for a dead human body and does not include vaults, lawn crypts, mausoleums, or other outside receptacles for caskets.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 543.